Utah statutes.
19-5-111.   Notice of violations -- Hearings.

(1)  Whenever the board determines there are reasonable grounds to believe that there has been a violation of this chapter or any order of the board, it may give written notice to the alleged violator specifying the provisions that have been violated and the facts that constitute the violation.

(2)  The notice shall require that the matters complained of be corrected.

(3)  The notice may order the alleged violator to appear before an administrative law judge as provided by Section 19-1-301 at a time and place specified in the notice and answer the charges.

